Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Chapter 36 Municipal Energy Authority Act
7-36-109. Powers of board of directors.

The affairs of the authority and the exercise of the powers of the authority shall be vested in the board of directors. The following powers shall be exercised directly by the board by resolution of the board:

Selection and employment of the president, who shall serve as the chief executive officer of the authority, who shall serve at the pleasure of the board, and whose compensation shall be set by the board. Nothing in this chapter shall prevent the board from entering into an employment contract with the president. The president shall select, employ, and discharge all employees and fix their duties and compensation;

Issuance of bonds of the authority and the encumbering of assets of the authority, to the extent authorized in this chapter, to secure any such bonds;

Approval of rates of each of the systems;

Approval of the annual budget of each of the systems;

Adoption of bylaws for the conduct of the business of the board;

Selection of any certified public accountant to perform audits of the books and affairs of the authority; and

Adoption of a purchasing policy for the authority and the approval of purchases and disposition of property in accordance with the terms thereof.

All other powers of the authority shall be exercised by the president of the authority and the officers, agents, and employees of the authority, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1 enacted a new chapter 41, §§7-41-101 —7-41-132, but the chapter has been redesignated as chapter 36, §§7-36-101 —7-36-132 by authority of the Code Commission.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 3. April 27, 2016.

7-36-110. Appointment of directors — Chair and vice chair — Meetings — Removal from office.

The initial board of directors of the authority shall be composed of the members of the board of directors of the supervisory board, who shall serve as directors for the unexpired terms of their appointment to the board of directors of the supervisory board and who shall take office and begin exercising the powers granted in this section immediately upon the registration date of the certificate of incorporation.

All subsequent appointments shall be for four-year terms, or such other term length as may be set forth in the certificate of incorporation, commencing upon the expiration of the prior director's specific term. Except as otherwise provided in the certificate of incorporation, the board of directors shall fill vacancies, subject to the approval of the governing body of the associated municipality, or such governing body of another municipality having appointment power for a member of the supervisory board at the time the authority is formed. In the event the applicable governing body does not approve the person thus appointed by the board of directors, the board of directors shall appoint some other person, subject to the approval of the applicable governing body. The composition and manner of the appointment for members of the board of directors set forth in this section may be modified pursuant to the certificate of incorporation or an amendment to the certificate of incorporation; provided, that the applicable governing body having a power of appointment shall approve any provision of the certificate of incorporation or amendment that eliminates its power of appointment. The associated municipality shall, at all times, have authority to approve no less than a majority of the members of the board of directors.

The board of directors and the applicable governing body shall, as applicable and in accordance with this section, within ninety (90) days, fill each vacancy created by the death, resignation, or removal of any director and gain approval of the applicable governing body, and such director shall serve for the remaining unexpired term of the former director.

Except as provided in subsection (g), each director shall hold office until the director's successor is appointed, approved, and qualified, and each director shall be eligible for reappointment unless otherwise provided in the certificate of incorporation.

Immediately upon their qualification as a board, and at least annually thereafter, the board of directors shall select from the board's membership a chair and a vice chair. No additional compensation shall be paid to a director for serving as a chair or vice chair. The board shall have a recording secretary, who need not be a member of the board and who shall be appointed by the president, subject to the approval of the board. The recording secretary shall record all minutes of the board, keep and maintain all books and records of the board, and perform other duties as the president shall determine.

The board shall hold regular monthly meetings and special meetings as may be necessary for the transaction of the business of the authority. Special meetings of the board may be called by the chair or, in the absence or disability of the chair, by any board member. No meeting of the board shall be held unless a majority of the directors are present. All acts of the board shall be by a vote of at least a majority of the directors eligible to vote on a matter. Resolutions of the board shall be effective upon adoption after one (1) reading and may be adopted at the same meeting at which the resolutions are introduced. The time and place of all meetings will be set by the board. The board of directors shall be allowed necessary traveling and other expenses while engaged in the business of the board, plus an allowance for attendance at meetings in the same manner and to the same extent as is provided for directors of municipal electric systems under § 7-52-110(e). Such expenses shall constitute a cost of operation and maintenance of the authority.

Any director may be removed from office for cause upon a vote of two-thirds (2/3) of the members of the governing body of the applicable approving governing body, but only after preferment of formal charges by resolution of a majority of the members of the governing body.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1 enacted a new chapter 41, §§7-41-101 —7-41-132, but the chapter has been redesignated as chapter 36, §§7-36-101 —7-36-132 by authority of the Code Commission.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 3. April 27, 2016.

7-36-111. President.

The board shall appoint a president, as provided in § 7-36-109(a)(1), who shall be chief executive officer of the authority. The salary of the president shall be fixed by the board, and the board may enter into an employment contract with the president for a term of no more than five (5) years containing such terms as the board may deem advisable. The president may be removed by the board, subject to any provisions contained in an employment contract with the president.

Within the limits of the funds available, and subject to exercise by the board of the powers reserved to it pursuant to § 7-36-109, all powers of the authority granted in this chapter shall be exercised by the president and the various officers and employees of the authority.

The president shall have charge of the management and operation of the systems and the enforcement and execution of all rules, regulations, programs, plans, and decisions made or adopted by the board.

The president shall appoint each system division head and all officers of the authority, and the president or the president's designee shall hire all employees of the authority. All officers and employees of the authority shall serve at the pleasure of the president, and the president shall be responsible for maintaining an adequate workforce for the authority.

Subject to §§ 7-36-109 and 7-36-112, the president is authorized to acquire and dispose of all property, real and personal, necessary to effectuate this chapter. The title of such property shall be taken in the name of the authority.

All contracts, agreements, indentures, trust agreements, and other instruments necessary or proper in carrying out the purposes and powers of the authority or in conducting the affairs of the authority or in operating the systems of the authority shall be executed by the president, the president's designee, or such other officer or person as may be authorized by the board, the signature thereof to be binding upon the authority. The execution by the president, the president's designee, or such other officer or person as may be authorized by the board of any such contract, agreement, indenture, trust agreement, or instrument implementing or evidencing the exercise of powers reserved to the board pursuant to § 7-36-109 shall first be approved by resolution of the board.

The president shall cause to be kept full and proper books and records of all operations and affairs of the authority and shall cause to be kept separate books and accounts for each system, so that these books and accounts will reflect the financial condition of each division separately, and may require that the moneys and securities of each division be placed in separate funds to the end that each division shall be self-sustaining. All divisions shall be audited annually by an independent certified public accountant selected by the board.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1 enacted a new chapter 41, §§7-41-101 —7-41-132, but the chapter has been redesignated as chapter 36, §§7-36-101 —7-36-132 by authority of the Code Commission.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 3. April 27, 2016.

7-36-112. Policy governing purchases of services or property, leases and lease-purchases, and disposition of property — Power to dispose of electric plant.

The board shall adopt a policy governing all purchases of services or property, whether real or personal, all leases and lease-purchases, and the disposition of all property of the authority. The policy shall authorize the president, the president's designee, or such other officer or person as may be authorized by the board, to enter into contracts and agreements for the purchase of services or property, real or personal, leases and lease-purchases, disposition of property of the authority with a value not exceeding an amount from time to time established by the board but not less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), and providing for board approval for such purchases, leases, lease-purchases, and dispositions in excess of such amount. Subject to the terms of the purchasing policy relating to board approval, the president, the president's designee, or such other officer or person as may be authorized by the board, on behalf of the authority, shall be authorized to execute all contracts, purchase orders, and other documents necessary in connection with the purchase of property or services and the disposition of property of the authority, including deeds of conveyance of real property. The policy authorized by this subsection (a) shall provide for competitive bidding, but may provide exceptions to any competitive bidding requirements where exceptions are provided to municipalities, municipal electric systems, municipal utilities, or energy acquisition corporations under the general law. The purchasing policy may also provide procedures for documentation of compliance with purchasing procedures and such other provisions and terms as the board deems necessary.

Notwithstanding this chapter to the contrary, the authority does not have any power to dispose of all or substantially all of the electric, water, or wastewater system of the authority, as applicable, except upon the concurrence and consent of the governing body of the associated municipality and, in the case of the disposition of the electric plant of the authority, except upon the further approval of a majority of those voting in a referendum called by the governing body of the associated municipality in accordance with § 7-52-132. For purposes of establishing compliance with § 7-52-132, the board is deemed the “supervisory body,” the electric plant of the authority is deemed an “electric plant,” and such compliance shall be determined in the same manner and to the same extent as if the authority were operated as the electric system of the associated municipality.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1; 2017, ch. 446, § 13.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1 enacted a new chapter 41, §§7-41-101 —7-41-132, but the chapter has been redesignated as chapter 36, §§7-36-101 —7-36-132 by authority of the Code Commission.

2017 Amendments. The 2017 amendment, in (b), substituted “does” for “shall” preceding “not have”, “electric, water, or wastewater system of the authority, as applicable,” for “electric plant of the authority” preceding “except upon the concurrence”, substituted “and, in the case of the disposition of the electric plant of the authority, except upon the further” for “and upon” preceding “approval”, and twice substituted “is” for “shall be” preceding “deemed”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 3. April 27, 2016.

Acts 2017, ch. 446, § 19. May 25, 2017.

7-36-113. Issuance of bonds — Proceeds of sale of bonds.

The authority shall have power and is authorized to issue its bonds for the construction, acquisition, reconstruction, improvement, betterment, or extension of any system of the authority or to assume and to agree to pay any indebtedness incurred for any of the foregoing purposes. The proceeds of the sale of any bonds may be applied to:

The payment of the costs of such construction, acquisition, reconstruction, improvement, betterment, or extension;

The payment of the costs associated with any such construction, acquisition, reconstruction, improvement, betterment, or extension, including engineering, architectural, inspection, legal, and accounting expenses;

The payment of the costs of issuance of such bonds, including underwriter's discount, financial advisory fee, preparation of the definitive bonds, preparation of all public offering and marketing materials, advertising, credit enhancement, and legal, accounting, fiscal, and other similar expenses;

The payment of interest during the period of construction and for six (6) months thereafter on any money borrowed or estimated to be borrowed;

Reimbursement of the authority for moneys previously spent by the authority for any of the purposes described in subdivisions (a)(1)-(4);

The establishment of reasonable reserves for the payment of debt service on such bonds, or for repair and replacement to the system of the authority for whose benefit the financing is being undertaken, or for such other purposes as the board deems necessary in connection with the issuance of any bonds and operation of the system for whose benefit the financing is being undertaken;

The contribution of the authority's share of the funding for any joint undertaking for the purposes set forth in this subsection (a); and

The contribution by the authority to any subsidiary or separate entity controlled by the authority for the purposes set forth in this subsection (a).

The authority shall have the power and is authorized to issue its bonds to refund and refinance outstanding bonds of the authority hereafter issued or lawfully assumed by the authority. The proceeds of the sale of the bonds may be applied to:

The payment of the principal amount of the bonds being refunded and refinanced;

The payment of the redemption premium thereon, if any;

The payment of unpaid interest on the bonds being refunded, including interest in arrears, for the payment of which sufficient funds are not available, to the date of delivery or exchange of the refunding bonds;

The payment of interest on the bonds being refunded and refinanced from the date of delivery of the refunding bonds to maturity or to, and including, the first or any subsequent available redemption date or dates on which the bonds being refunded may be called for redemption;

The payment of the costs of issuance of the refunding bonds, including underwriter's discount, financial advisory fee, preparation of the definitive bonds, preparation of all public offering and marketing materials, advertising, credit enhancement, and legal, accounting, fiscal, and other similar expenses, and the costs of refunding the outstanding bonds, including the costs of establishing an escrow for the retirement of the outstanding bonds, trustee, and escrow agent fees in connection with any escrow, and accounting, legal, and other professional fees in connection therewith; and

The establishment of reasonable reserves for the payment of debt service on the refunding bonds, or for repair and replacement to the system of the authority for whose benefit the financing is being undertaken, or for such other purposes as shall be deemed necessary in connection with the issuance of the refunding bonds and operation of the system for whose benefit the financing is being undertaken. Refunding bonds may be issued to refinance and refund more than one (1) issue of outstanding bonds, notwithstanding that such outstanding bonds may have been issued at different times. Refunding bonds may be issued jointly with other refunding bonds or other bonds of the authority. The principal proceeds from the sale of refunding bonds may be applied either to the immediate payment and retirement of the bonds being refunded or, to the extent not required for the immediate payment of the bonds being refunded, to the deposit in escrow with a bank or trust company to provide for the payment and retirement at a later date of the bonds being refunded.

The authority shall have the power and is authorized to issue its bonds to retire all bonds of the associated municipality issued to finance or refinance any of the systems, and, to the extent permitted by contracts with any of the owners of the municipal bonds, to assume and agree to pay when due the municipal bonds, retire the municipal bonds, or deposit in escrow funds sufficient, together with earnings thereon, to retire the municipal bonds at maturity or upon redemption. The proceeds of such bonds may be used in the same manner and to the same extent as permitted under subsection (b).

The authority has the power and is authorized to issue notes in anticipation of the collection of revenues from the system for whose benefit the financing is undertaken for the purpose of financing electrical power purchases, including transmission costs, storage costs, and pipeline capacity costs. Any such notes must be secured solely by a pledge of, and lien on, the revenues of the system for whose benefit the financing is undertaken. The principal amount of notes that may be issued during any twelve-month period must not exceed sixty percent (60%) of total electrical power purchases for the same period, and all notes issued during such period must be retired and paid in full on, or before, the end of such period. The notes must be sold in such manner, at such price, and upon such terms and conditions as may be determined by the board. No notes shall be issued under this subsection (d) unless the electric system has positive retained earnings as shown in the most recent audited financial statements of the system, and the system has produced positive net income in at least one (1) fiscal year out of the three (3) fiscal years next preceding the issuance of the notes as shown on the audited financial statements of the system. No notes issued under this subsection (d) shall be issued without first being approved by the comptroller of the treasury. If revenues of such system are insufficient to pay all such notes at maturity, any unpaid notes may be renewed one (1) time for a period not to exceed one (1) year or otherwise liquidated as approved by the comptroller of the treasury.

The authority shall have the power and is authorized to issue its bonds to finance in whole or in part the cost of the acquisition of electrical power purchased from the Tennessee Valley authority on a current or long-term prepaid purchase basis and pledge to the punctual payment of any such bonds and interest thereon its rights in such contracts and an amount of the revenues from its electric system, or of any part of such system, sufficient to pay the bonds and interest as the same shall become due and create and maintain reasonable reserves therefor. Such amount shall consist of all or any part or portion of such revenue; and the board in determining the cost of the acquisition of electrical power under this subsection (e) may include all costs and estimated costs of the issuance of the bonds, and all engineering, inspection, fiscal, and legal expenses.

Bonds issued under this section as a part of an issue the last maturity of which is not later than five (5) years following the date of issue shall be issued, and referred to, as notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1; 2017, ch. 446, § 14.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1 enacted a new chapter 41, §§7-41-101 —7-41-132, but the chapter has been redesignated as chapter 36, §§7-36-101 —7-36-132 by authority of the Code Commission.

2017 Amendments. The 2017 amendment, in (d), in the first sentence, substituted “has the power and is authorized” for “shall have the power” preceding “to issue” and substituted “transmission costs, storage costs, and pipeline capacity costs” for “transmission costs” at the end; in the second sentence, substituted “must for “shall” preceding “be secured” and “ system. for whose benefit the financing is undertaken” for “electric system” at the end; in the third sentence, substituted “that” for “which” preceding “may be issued”; and in the fourth sentence, substituted “The notes must” for “The notes shall”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 3. April 27, 2016.

Acts 2017, ch. 446, § 19. May 25, 2017.

7-36-114. Resolution authorizing issuance or assumption of bonds — Repurchase of bonds — Temporary bonds — Contract or agreement facilitating issuance and sale of bonds.

No bonds shall be issued or assumed under this chapter unless authorized to be issued or assumed by resolution of the board, which resolution may be adopted at the same meeting at which it is introduced by a majority of all members then in office, and shall take effect immediately upon adoption. Bonds authorized to be issued under this chapter may be issued in one (1) or more series, may bear such date, mature at such time, not exceeding forty (40) years from their respective dates, bear interest at such rate, payable at such time, be in such denominations, be in such form, either coupon or registered, be executed in such manner, be payable in such medium of payment, at such place, and be subject to such terms of redemption, with or without premium, as such resolution may provide. Bonds may be issued for money or property at competitive or negotiated sale for such price as the board, or its designee, shall determine.

Bonds may be repurchased by the authority out of any available funds at a price not to exceed the principal amount of the outstanding bonds and accrued interest, and all bonds so repurchased shall be cancelled or held as an investment of the authority as the board may determine.

Pending the preparation or execution of definitive bonds, interim receipts or certificates or temporary bonds may be delivered to the purchasers of bonds.

With respect to all or any portion of any issue of bonds issued under this chapter, at any time during the term of the bonds, and upon receipt of a report of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee finding that the contracts and agreements authorized in this subsection (d) are in compliance with the guidelines or rules promulgated by the state funding board, as set forth in § 7-34-109(h), the authority, by resolution of the board, may authorize and enter into interest rate swap or exchange agreements, agreements establishing interest rate floors or ceilings or both, and other interest rate hedging agreements under such terms and conditions as the board may determine, including, without limitation, provisions permitting the authority to pay to, or receive from, any person or entity any loss of benefits under such agreement upon early termination thereof or default under such agreement.

The authority may enter into an agreement to sell bonds, other than its refunding bonds, under this chapter providing for delivery of its bonds on a date greater than ninety (90) days and not greater than five (5) years, or such greater period of time if approved by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee, from the date of execution of such agreement or to sell its refunding bonds providing for delivery thereof on a date greater than ninety (90) days from the date of execution of the agreement and not greater than the first optional redemption date on which the bonds being refunded can be optionally redeemed resulting in cost savings or at par, whichever is earlier, only upon receipt of a report of the comptroller of the treasury, or the comptroller's designee, finding that the agreement or contract of the authority to sell its bonds as authorized in this subsection (d) is in compliance with rules promulgated by the state funding board in accordance with § 7-34-109(h). Agreements to sell bonds and refunding bonds for delivery ninety (90) days or less from the date of execution of the agreement do not require a report of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee.

Prior to the adoption by the board of a resolution authorizing a contract or agreement described in subdivision (d)(1) or (d)(2), a request shall be submitted to the comptroller of the treasury, or the comptroller's designee, for a report finding that such contract or agreement is in compliance with the guidelines or rules of the state funding board. Within fifteen (15) days of receipt of the request, the comptroller of the treasury, or the comptroller's designee, shall determine whether the contract or agreement substantially complies with the guidelines or rules and shall report such compliance to the authority. If the report of the comptroller of the treasury, or the comptroller's designee, finds that the contract or agreement complies with the guidelines or rules of the state funding board, or the comptroller of the treasury, or the comptroller's designee, fails to report within the fifteen-day period, then the authority may take such action with respect to the proposed contract or agreement as it deems advisable in accordance with this section and the guidelines or rules of the state funding board. If the report of the comptroller of the treasury, or the comptroller's designee, finds that such contract or agreement is not in compliance with the guidelines or rules, then the authority is not authorized to enter into such contract or agreement. The rules shall provide for an appeal process upon a determination of noncompliance.

When entering into any contract or agreement facilitating the issuance and sale of bonds, including contracts or agreements providing for liquidity and credit enhancement and reimbursement agreements relating thereto, interest rate swap or exchange agreements, agreements establishing interest rate floors or ceilings or both, other interest rate hedging agreements, and agreements with the purchaser of the bonds, evidencing a transaction bearing a reasonable relationship to this state and also to another state or nation, the authority may agree in the written contract or agreement that the rights and remedies of the parties thereto shall be governed by the laws of this state or the laws of such other state or nation; provided, that jurisdiction over the authority shall lie solely in the courts sitting in the county where the authority's principal office is located. Nothing in the selection of laws of another state or nation shall alter, impair, or modify the rights, privileges, and obligations of the authority as a governmental entity under this chapter and under the laws of this state.

Prior to the adoption or promulgation by the state funding board of rules with respect to the contracts and agreements authorized in subdivisions (d)(1) and (d)(2), the authority may enter into such contracts or agreements to the extent otherwise authorized by the laws of this state.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1 enacted a new chapter 41, §§7-41-101 —7-41-132, but the chapter has been redesignated as chapter 36, §§7-36-101 —7-36-132 by authority of the Code Commission.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 3. April 27, 2016.

7-36-115. Power to secure bonds and to covenant as to bonds.

In order to secure the payment of the principal and interest on the bonds issued under this chapter, or in connection with such bonds, the authority has the power to secure such bonds and to covenant as to the bonds as set forth in §§ 9-21-306 and 7-34-110.

In connection with the issuance of bonds and in order to secure the payment of its bonds, the authority shall have power:

To pledge all or any part of its revenues;

To vest in any trustee the right to enforce any covenant made to secure, to pay, or in relation to its bonds, to provide for the powers and duties of such trustee, to limit the liabilities thereof, and to provide the terms and conditions upon which the trustee or the holders of bonds or any amount or proportion of them may enforce any such covenant; and

To make such covenants and to do such acts as may be necessary in order to secure its bonds or which, in the absolute discretion of the board, tend to make the bonds more marketable, notwithstanding that such covenants and acts may restrict or interfere with the exercise of the powers granted in this chapter. The authority shall be given the power to do all things in the issuance of bonds, and for their security, that a private business corporation can do under the laws of this state.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1 enacted a new chapter 41, §§7-41-101 —7-41-132, but the chapter has been redesignated as chapter 36, §§7-36-101 —7-36-132 by authority of the Code Commission.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 3. April 27, 2016.

7-36-116. Rights and remedies of bondholders.

In addition to all other rights and remedies, any holders of bonds of the authority, including a trustee for bondholders, shall have the right:

By mandamus or other suit, action, or proceeding at law or in equity, to enforce the bondholder's rights against the authority and the board of the authority, including the right to require the authority and such board to fix and collect rates and charges adequate to carry out any agreement as to, or pledge of, the revenues produced by such rates or charges, and to require the authority and such board to carry out any other covenant and agreement with such bondholders and to perform their duties under this chapter;

By action or suit in equity, to enjoin any acts which may be unlawful or a violation of the rights of such holder of bonds;

By suit, action, or proceeding in the chancery court sitting in the county in which the authority's principal office is located, to obtain an appointment of a receiver of any system of the authority or any part thereof. If such receiver be appointed, such receiver may enter and take possession of such system or part thereof and operate and maintain same, and collect and receive all fees, rents, tolls, or other charges arising therefrom in the same manner as the authority itself might do and shall dispose of such money in a separate account and apply the same in accordance with the obligations of the authority as the court shall direct; and

By suit, action, or proceeding in the chancery court sitting in the county in which the authority's principal office is located, to require the board of the authority to account as if it were the trustee of an express trust.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1 enacted a new chapter 41, §§7-41-101 —7-41-132, but the chapter has been redesignated as chapter 36, §§7-36-101 —7-36-132 by authority of the Code Commission.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 3. April 27, 2016.

7-36-117. Bond not debt of state, municipality, or other political subdivision of state.

No owner of any bonds issued under this chapter shall have the right to compel any exercise of the taxing powers of this state, the associated municipality, or any other municipality or political subdivision of this state to pay such bonds or the interest thereon. Each bond issued under this chapter shall recite in substance that such bond, including the interest thereon, is payable solely from the revenues pledged to the payment thereof, and that the bond does not constitute a debt of this state, any municipality, or any other political subdivision of this state.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1 enacted a new chapter 41, §§7-41-101 —7-41-132, but the chapter has been redesignated as chapter 36, §§7-36-101 —7-36-132 by authority of the Code Commission.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 3. April 27, 2016.

7-36-118. Validity of bonds.

Bonds issued under this chapter bearing the signature of the president or other authorized officer in office on the date of the signing thereof shall be valid and binding obligations; provided, that before the delivery thereof and payment therefor, any person whose signature appears thereon shall have ceased to be an officer. The validity of any bonds shall not be dependent on, or affected by, the validity or regularity of any proceedings relating to the acquisition or improvement of the system for which such bonds are issued. The resolution authorizing bonds may provide that the bonds shall contain a recital that the bonds are issued pursuant to this chapter, which recital shall be conclusive evidence of the bonds' validity and of the regularity of the bonds' issuance.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1 enacted a new chapter 41, §§7-41-101 —7-41-132, but the chapter has been redesignated as chapter 36, §§7-36-101 —7-36-132 by authority of the Code Commission.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 3. April 27, 2016.

7-36-119. Rates, fees, or other charges for services, facilities, and commodities.

The authority shall not be operated for gain or profit or primarily as a source of revenue to the associated municipality or any other person or entity. The authority shall, however, prescribe and collect rates, fees, or charges for the services, facilities, and commodities made available by the authority, and shall revise such rates, fees, or charges from time to time whenever necessary so that each system, or any combined systems as authorized in this chapter, shall be and always remain self-supporting, and shall not require appropriations by the associated municipality or any other municipality, this state, or any political subdivision of this state to carry out the authority's purpose. Any one (1) system of the authority shall not subsidize any other system, unless the systems are operated as a combined system in accordance with the terms of this chapter, in which case the combined system shall be self-supporting. The authority shall keep books and records as may be required to properly account for the reasonable distribution of joint or common expenses between the systems of the authority.

The rates, fees, or charges prescribed for each system shall be such as will produce revenue at least sufficient:

To provide for the payment of all expenses of operation and maintenance of such system;

To pay when due principal of, and interest on, all bonds of the authority payable from the revenues of such system;

To pay any payments in lieu of taxes authorized to be paid pursuant to this chapter; and

To establish proper reserves for the system.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1; 2017, ch. 446, § 15.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1 enacted a new chapter 41, §§7-41-101 —7-41-132, but the chapter has been redesignated as chapter 36, §§7-36-101 —7-36-132 by authority of the Code Commission.

2017 Amendments. The 2017 amendment, in (a), inserted “from time to time” preceding “whenever necessary”, inserted “, or any combined systems as authorized in this chapter” following “each system”, inserted “be and always” preceding “remain”, and substituted “unless the systems are operated as a combined system in accordance with the terms of this chapter, in which case the combined system shall be self-supporting. The authority shall keep” for “and the authority shall keep such” preceding “books and records”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 3. April 27, 2016.

Acts 2017, ch. 446, § 19. May 25, 2017.

7-36-120. Pledge of, or lien on, revenues, fees, rents, tolls, or other charges.

Any pledge of, or lien on, revenues, fees, rents, tolls, or other charges received or receivable by the authority to secure the payment of any bonds of the authority, and the interest thereon, shall be valid and binding from the time that the pledge or lien is created or granted and shall inure to the benefit of any owner of any such bonds until the payment in full of the principal thereof and premium and interest thereon. The priority of any pledge or lien with respect to competing pledges or liens shall be determined by the date such pledge or lien is created or granted. Neither the resolution nor any other instrument granting, creating, or giving notice of the pledge or lien need be filed or recorded to preserve or protect the validity or priority of such pledge or lien.

If a conflict arises between this section and the Perfection, Priority and Enforcement of Public Pledges and Liens Act, compiled in title 9, chapter 22, the Perfection, Priority and Enforcement of Public Pledges and Liens Act shall control.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1 enacted a new chapter 41, §§7-41-101 —7-41-132, but the chapter has been redesignated as chapter 36, §§7-36-101 —7-36-132 by authority of the Code Commission.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 3. April 27, 2016.

7-36-121. Tax exemption.

So long as the authority owns any of the systems, the property and revenue of such system shall be exempt from all state, county, and municipal taxation. Any bonds issued by the authority pursuant to this chapter, and the income therefrom, shall be exempt from all state, county, and municipal taxation, except inheritance, transfer and estate taxes, and except as otherwise provided by the laws of this state.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 1 enacted a new chapter 41, §§7-41-101 —7-41-132, but the chapter has been redesignated as chapter 36, §§7-36-101 —7-36-132 by authority of the Code Commission.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 995, § 3. April 27, 2016.